Washington statutes.
RCW 19.150.030

Unpaid rent—Denial of access to storage space.

When any part of the rent or other charges due from an occupant remains unpaid for six consecutive days, and the rental agreement so provides, an owner may deny the occupant access to the storage space at a self-service storage facility.

[ 1988 c 240 s 4.]